Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-3234.01
Districts; grant easements.

A district may grant easements across real estate under its ownership for purposes which are in the public interest and do not adversely affect the primary purpose for which such real estate is owned by the district.

Laws 1984, LB 861, § 14.